District of Columbia statutes.
7-839

Appropriation.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated out of the general revenues of the District of Columbia government sufficient funds to carry out the requirements of this subchapter.

History

Apr. 29, 1980, D.C. Law 3-65, § 10, 27 DCR 1087
July 25, 1985, D.C. Law 6-13, § 2(e), 32 DCR 3235

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-319.